California, session 20252026, AB360.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 128570) is added to Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 6. Menopause128570. (a) The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall work with the Medical Board of California, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and state higher education entities to assess both of the following:(1) Physicians and surgeons’ education and training regarding menopause diagnosis and management.(2) Trends in practice patterns regarding menopause diagnosis and treatment by specialty, region, sex, race or ethnicity, medical practice setting, and experience.(b) (1) The Department of Health Care Access and Information shall prepare a report to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2027, that does both of the following:(A) Identifies gaps in medical education and training related to menopause and in menopause diagnosis and management practices among physicians and surgeons.(B) Recommends state policy needed to improve menopause-related education and training and to improve health outcomes for people who experience menopause.(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Section 2425.5 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2425.5.(a)The board shall develop and administer to a licensed physician and surgeon as part of the license renewal process the following menopause training surveys:(1)An initial survey that includes, but is not limited to, questions concerning the licensed physician and surgeon’s training relating to menopause.(2)Subsequent surveys that include, but are not limited to, the licensed physician and surgeon’s training relating to menopause received since the licensed physician and surgeon submitted the initial survey described in paragraph (1).(b)The purpose of the surveys shall be for the board to assess the extent of training licensed physicians and surgeons have received regarding menopause, menopause symptoms, and the relevant management options available for menopause.(c)The board shall determine the format of the surveys, which shall be conducted anonymously, and may develop regulations as necessary to administer this section.(d)The board shall not deny an application for license renewal solely on the basis that the applicant failed to complete a survey on menopause, as provided in this section.